District of Columbia statutes.
4-754.55

Retaliation prohibited.

No person shall retaliate against a person who brings a complaint or provides information to the Office relevant to the performance of its duties. The Office shall report any violation of this section to the Interagency Council and the Office of the Inspector General.

History

Oct. 22, 2005, D.C. Law 16-35, § 27e
as added Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-296, § 2(i), 54 DCR 1097